New York, session 2025-2026, A10383.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. Fragmented medical records 2 drive delays, costs, and compliance burdens for patients, providers, and 3 insurers. To address this, New York should modernize its data infras- 4 tructure with a secure, interoperable, blockchain-enabled digital health 5 ID administered by the department of health, improving record portabil- 6 ity, real-time authorized access, and reducing manual transfers. 7 New York already operates the New York State of Health Marketplace and 8 the SHIN-NY health information network, both under the department of 9 health. However, they lack full interoperability and a unified patient 10 identity. Integrating blockchain-based digital IDs into the New York 11 State of Health and building on SHIN-NY would create a single secure 12 health account per patient, strengthen coordination among providers and 13 payers, enhance user control over data access, reduce fraud and identity 14 theft, and limit commercial misuse of personal data. These IDs also 15 provide individuals with sovereign control over access to personal 16 records and secure data from fraud and identity theft. 17 The department of health should also evaluate smart contracts in the 18 insurance marketplace. These self-executing agreements can cut fraud, 19 errors, and processing time by releasing funds only when validated 20 conditions are met, helping prevent upcoding and unbundling while yield- 21 ing cost savings across hospital systems and for patients. 22 § 2. Study and draft implementation plan. The commissioner of the 23 department of health is hereby directed to conduct a comprehensive study 24 and produce a draft implementation plan examining the feasibility, bene- 25 fits, risks, costs, and operational impacts of integrating blockchain EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14785-01-6 A. 10383 2 1 technology into the New York State of Health Marketplace and SHIN-NY, 2 consistent with state and federal privacy, security, and data-sharing 3 laws, including, but not limited to: 4 1. the use of secure, privacy-preserving digital health identification 5 accounts; 6 2. the application of smart contracts in insurance administration, 7 including eligibility verification, enrollment, and claims processing; 8 and 9 3. interoperability between the New York State of Health platform and 10 SHIN-NY, including standards for data governance, access controls, and 11 auditability. 12 § 3. Report. The commissioner of the department of health shall submit 13 a report of the study's findings and the draft implementation plan to 14 the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the 15 assembly, the minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of 16 the assembly no later than one year after the effective date of this 17 act. The study and draft implementation plan shall also be made public- 18 ly available on the department's website. 19 § 4. Public comment. Upon completion, the department of health shall 20 release the study and draft implementation plan for a public comment 21 period of no less than two months, and shall actively solicit input from 22 stakeholders, including health care providers, insurers, patient advo- 23 cates, privacy experts, and technology experts. 24 § 5. Final plan. Following consideration of public comments, the 25 department of health shall finalize the implementation plan and submit 26 the final plan to the governor and the legislature. No implementation 27 actions shall be undertaken unless authorized by subsequent legislative 28 enactment or existing law. 29 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.